California, session 20252026, AB2244.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 5 (commencing with Section 110423.200) is added to Chapter 4 of Part 5 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: Article 5. Non-Ultraprocessed Certified110423.200. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide consumers with reliable and easily accessible health-related information so that they can make informed choices when purchasing food and beverages.110423.201. For purposes of this article, all of the following definitions apply:(a) “Accredited certification agent” means an entity accredited by the department to certify products as “Non-Ultraprocessed Certified.” (b) “Department” means the State Department of Public Health.(c) “Non-Ultraprocessed Certified” means a product that has been certified by an accredited certification agent.110423.202. (a) No later than June 1, 2028, the department shall accredit certification agents that can certify products as “Non-Ultraprocessed Certified” pursuant to this section.(b) An accredited certification agent shall not certify a product as “Non-Ultraprocessed Certified” if it is classified as any of the following:(1) An ultraprocessed food, as defined in Section 104661.(2) An ultraprocessed food of concern, as defined in Section 104662.(3) A restricted school food, as defined in Section 104662.(c) A product shall be recertified as “Non-Ultraprocessed Certified” no less frequently than every three years.(d) If a product using the “Non-Ultraprocessed Certified” seal is reformulated, an applicant for certification of a product shall submit an application to the accredited certification agent within 30 days for recertification of the reformulated product.110423.203. (a) The department shall create a standardized seal that may incorporate both of the following:(1) The phrase “Non-Ultraprocessed Certified Food Standard.”(2) Images and themes associated with California and healthy, nutritious whole foods.(b) A person may use the “Non-Ultraprocessed Certified” seal on a product only if the product has been certified by an accredited certification agent pursuant to this article.(c) The seal may be placed on the principal display panel, the information panel, or elsewhere on the package, provided that the seal does not obscure other required information, such as the nutrition facts panel or the statement of identity.110423.204. (a) An accredited certification agent shall do all of the following:(1) Register with the department on a form provided by the department.(2) Annually renew the registration, unless the certification agency is no longer engaged in certifying products pursuant to this article.(3) Provide a list to the department of all the products certified by the accredited certification agent.(b) Any registration information submitted by an accredited certification agent to the department shall be made available to the public for inspection and copying.110423.205. (a) An accredited certification agent that certifies products sold as “Non-Ultraprocessed Certified” shall immediately make the following records available for inspection by, and shall, upon request within three business days of the request, or within a reasonable time exceeding three business days as determined by the department, provide a copy to, the department:(1) Records obtained from applicants for certification of a product.(2) Records created by the accredited certification agent regarding applications for certification of a product.(b) The department may audit the accredited certification agent’s certification procedures and records at any time, but any records of the accredited certification agent not otherwise required to be disclosed shall be kept confidential by the department.(c) The department shall maintain a public internet webpage that lists all of the products currently certified as “Non-Ultraprocessed Certified” as reported by the accredited certification agent.110423.206. The department may adopt any regulations as are reasonably necessary to assist in the implementation of, or to make more specific the provisions of, this article.110423.207. (a) It is unlawful for a person to certify products as “Non-Ultraprocessed Certified” unless duly registered as an accredited certification agent.(b) It is unlawful for a person to willfully make a false statement or representation, or knowingly fail to disclose a fact required to be disclosed, in registration as an accredited certification agent pursuant to this article.(c) It is unlawful for a person to willfully make a false statement or representation, or knowingly fail to disclose a fact required to be disclosed to an accredited certification agent.(d) It is unlawful for a person to use the Non-Ultraprocessed Certified seal on a product that does not meet the provisions of this article.(e) A person who engages, has engaged, or proposes to engage in the misuse of the Non-Ultraprocessed Certified seal may be enjoined in any court of competent jurisdiction by any of the following:(1) The department.(2) The Attorney General, county counsel, city attorney, or city prosecutor in a city having a full-time city prosecutor in the name of the people of the State of California.(3) A consumer, business entity, or non-profit organization.110423.208. A violation of this article shall not be subject to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 111825).SEC. 2. Chapter 12.9 (commencing with Section 114379.80) is added to Part 7 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 12.9. Clearly Identifiable114379.80. (a) For purposes of this chapter, “clearly identifiable” means a manner of offering a product for sale on a display unit or within a retail setting that allows a reasonable consumer to readily distinguish the product from other products, including through physical separation, signage, or other visual cues.(b) (1)Upon the creation of the standardized seal pursuant to Section 110423.203, a food facility, grocery store, as defined in paragraph (1) (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 113789, (e) of Section 113948, with gross annual store sales of more than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall make clearly identifiable at least 3 or more items certified according to Article 5 (commencing with Section 110423.200) if the food facility grocery store offers for sale more than 25 certified items.(2)For the purposes of this chapter, “food facility” does not include a restaurant or a facility listed in subdivision (b) of Section 113789.114379.81. A food facility grocery store described in Section 114379.80 that fails to meet the requirements of this chapter may be enjoined in any court of competent jurisdiction by the Attorney General, county counsel, city attorney, or city prosecutor in a city having a full-time city prosecutor in the name of the people of the State of California.114379.82. (a) A violation of this chapter shall not be subject to Section 114395.(b) A food facility grocery store shall be deemed in compliance with this chapter if it demonstrates that it has made a good faith effort to comply and has implemented reasonable policies, procedures, or employee training designed to achieve compliance.(c) De minimis or isolated instances of noncompliance that occur despite good faith efforts, including temporary conditions resulting from restocking, customer handling, or ordinary store operations, shall not constitute a violation of this chapter.114379.83. This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2040, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act, which adds Section 110423.205 to the Health and Safety Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:To ensure protection for confidential and proprietary business information, including, but not limited to, trade secrets, any records of the accredited certification agent not otherwise required to be disclosed shall be kept confidential by the department.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.